Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB71.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Designation.The Pennsylvania Judicial Center in the City of Harrisburg is designated as, and shall be referred to as, the Chief Justice Robert N. C. Nix, Jr. Judicial Center.Section 2. Duties of Department of General Services.The Department of General Services shall arrange for the fabrication of appropriate plaques or markers with the name designated under section 1 and shall affix the plaques or markers to the building.Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516